sl-SI: Vrsta žebljičkov na čevljih za golf: Hibridni (brez čepkov in s čepki); S čepki (kovinski); S čepki (zamenljivi mehki plastični čepki); Brez čepkov; Drugo
cs: Typ hrotu pro golfové boty: Hybridní (bez spiků i s hroty); Se spiky (kovové); Se spiky (vyměnitelné měkké plastové hroty); Bez spiků; Ostatní
nl: Golfschoen spike type: Hybride (zonder spikes en met noppen); Met spikes (metaal); Met spikes (vervangbare zachte plastic noppen); Zonder spikes; Anders
bg-BG: Тип шипове за голф обувки: Хибридни (без шипове и с бутонки); С шипове (метални); С шипове (сменяеми меки пластмасови бутонки); Без шипове; Друго
lt-LT: Golfo batų dyglių tipas: Hibridiniai (be dyglių ir su dygliais); Su dygliais (metaliniais); Su dygliais (keičiamais minkšto plastiko); Be dyglių; Kita
pt-PT: tipo de cravo para sapato de golfe: Híbrido (sem bicos e com pitões); Com bicos (metal); Com bicos (pitões de plástico macio substituíveis); Sem bicos; Outro
hu: Golfcipő tüske típusa: Hibrid (stopli nélküli és stoplis); Stoplis (fém); Stoplis (cserélhető puha műanyag); Stopli nélküli; Egyéb
ko: 골프화 스파이크 유형: 하이브리드(스파이크리스 및 클리트); 스파이크(금속); 스파이크(교체형 소프트 플라스틱 클리트); 스파이크리스; 기타
pl: Typ kolców butów golfowych: Hybrydowe (bez kolców i z korkami); Z kolcami (metalowe); Z kolcami (wymienne miękkie plastikowe korki); Bez kolców; Inny
sv: Typ av golfskospikar: Hybrid (spiklös och dobbar); Spik (metall); Spik (utbytbara mjuka plastdobbar); Spiklös; Annan
ru: Тип шипов обуви для гольфа: Гибридные (без шипов и с шипами); С шипами (металлические); С шипами (сменные мягкие пластиковые шипы); Без шипов; Другое
th: ประเภทของปุ่มรองเท้ากอล์ฟ: ไฮบริด (แบบไร้ปุ่มและแบบคลีท); แบบมีปุ่ม (โลหะ); แบบมีปุ่ม (คลีทพลาสติกอ่อนเปลี่ยนได้); แบบไร้ปุ่ม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Sapato de golfe cravo tipo: Híbrido (sem travas e com travas); Com travas (metal); Com travas (travas de plástico macio substituíveis); Sem travas; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta šiljaka za golf cipele: Hibridni (bez čepova i sa čepovima); Sa čepovima (metalni); Sa čepovima (zamjenski meki plastični čepovi); Bez čepova; Ostalo
zh-CN: 高尔夫球鞋鞋钉型: 混合型（无钉和鞋钉）; 带钉（金属）; 带钉（可替换软塑料鞋钉）; 无钉; 其他
es: Tipo de tacos para zapatos de golf: Híbrido (sin clavos y con tacos); Con clavos (metal); Con clavos (tacos de plástico blando reemplazables); Sin clavos; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul de crampoane pentru pantofi de golf: Hibrid (fără crampoane și cu crampoane); Cu crampoane (metalice); Cu crampoane (crampoane din plastic moale înlocuibile); Fără crampoane; Altele
fr: Type de crampons de la chaussure de golf: Hybride (sans crampons et avec crampons); À crampons (métal); À crampons (crampons en plastique souple remplaçables); Sans crampons; Autre
en: Golf shoe spike type: Hybrid (spikeless and cleats); Spiked (metal); Spiked (replaceable soft plastic cleats); Spikeless; Other
it: tipo di scarpa da golf con tacchetti: Ibrido (senza tacchetti e con tacchetti); Con tacchetti (metallo); Con tacchetti (tacchetti morbidi in plastica sostituibili); Senza tacchetti; Altro
fi: Golfkengän piikkien tyyppi: Hybridi (piikitön ja ruusukkeet); Piikillinen (metalli); Piikillinen (vaihdettavat pehmeät muoviruusukkeet); Piikitön; Muu
vi: Loại đinh giày golf: Lai (không đinh và có đinh); Có đinh (kim loại); Có đinh (đinh nhựa mềm thay thế được); Không đinh; Khác
de: Art der Golfschuhspikes: Hybrid (ohne Spikes und mit Stollen); Mit Spikes (Metall); Mit Spikes (austauschbare weiche Kunststoffstollen); Ohne Spikes; Andere
tr: Golf ayakkabısı çivisi türü: Hibrit (çivisiz ve kramponlu); Çivili (metal); Çivili (değiştirilebilir yumuşak plastik kramponlar); Çivisiz; Diğer
zh-TW: 高爾夫球鞋鞋釘類型: 混合型 (無釘和鞋釘); 釘鞋 (金屬釘); 釘鞋 (可替換軟塑膠釘); 無釘鞋; 其他
sk-SK: Typ hrotu pre golfovú obuv: Hybridné (bez spajkov a s hrotmi); So spajkami (kovové); So spajkami (vymeniteľné mäkké plastové hroty); Bez spajkov; Iné
el: Τύπος καρφιών παπουτσιού γκολφ: Υβριδικό (χωρίς καρφιά και με τάπες); Με καρφιά (μεταλλικά); Με καρφιά (αντικαταστάσιμες μαλακές πλαστικές τάπες); Χωρίς καρφιά; Άλλο
nb: Golfsko-pigger: Hybrid (piggefri og med knotter); Med pigger (metall); Med pigger (utskiftbare myke plastknotter); Piggefri; Annet
ja: ゴルフシューズのスパイクタイプ: ハイブリッド (スパイクレスとクリート); スパイク付き (金属); スパイク付き (交換可能なソフトプラスチッククリート); スパイクレス; その他
da: Type af golfskospikes: Hybrid (uden spikes og med klamper); Spikes (metal); Spikes (udskiftelige bløde plastklamper); Uden spikes; Anden